Vermont statutes. Title 2 Legislature
Chapter 17. Joint Carbon Emissions Reduction Committee

§ 601.
Creation of Committee.

There is created a Joint Carbon Emissions Reduction Committee whose membership shall be appointed each biennial session of the General Assembly. The Committee shall consist of five Representatives, at least one from the Committees on Appropriations, on Commerce and Economic Development, on Energy and Technology, and on Transportation, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House, and five members of the Senate, at least one from the Committees on Appropriations, on Finance, on Natural Resources and Energy, and on Transportation, to be appointed by the Committee on Committees.

The Committee shall elect a chair and vice chair. The Chair shall rotate biennially between the House and the Senate members. The Committee may meet during a session of the General Assembly at the call of the Chair and with the approval of the Speaker of the House and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate. The Committee may meet up to five times during adjournment. A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.

The Office of Legislative Counsel and the Office of Legislative Operations shall provide legal, professional, and administrative assistance to the Committee.

For attendance at a meeting when the General Assembly is not in session, members of the Committee shall be entitled to the same per diem compensation and expense reimbursement as provided members of standing committees pursuant to section 23 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 17, 1978; amended

2019, No. 62

, § 3;

2021, No. 20

, § 1.

§ 602.
Repealed. 2019, No. 62, § 3.

§ 603.
Duties.

The Joint Carbon Emissions Reduction Committee shall provide oversight when the General Assembly is not in session of State policies and activities concerning and affecting carbon emissions from Vermont’s electric, residential and commercial buildings, and transportation sectors.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 17, 1978; amended

2009, No. 33

, § 2;

2019, No. 62

, § 3.